Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202682-139
Support Nebraska History Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Support Nebraska History Cash Fund is created. The fund shall consist of money credited to the fund under section 60-3,163.02 and any other gifts, bequests, grants, or other contributions or donations to the fund from public or private entities. The Nebraska State Historical Society shall administer and distribute the Support Nebraska History Cash Fund. The fund shall be expended to promote the history of Nebraska on the Internet, to support history education for children in Nebraska, and for costs directly related to the administration of the fund. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Support Nebraska History Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2021, LB317, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB264, § 203;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 68.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.